New Jersey, session 221, S2524.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     As used in this section: Benefit includes, but need not be limited to, any pecuniary amount, any property, any services, any pecuniary amount sought to be avoided, or any injury or harm perpetrated on another where there is no pecuniary value. b.    A person is guilty of a crime if the person engages in one or more of the following actions by any means, including, but not limited to, the use of electronic communications or an internet website: (1)   purposefully or knowingly claims ownership or possession, or takes possession, of a residential dwelling without the consent of the lawful owner or an authorized agent of the lawful owner, for the purpose of renting the dwelling to another person or otherwise obtaining a benefit; or (2)   purposefully or knowingly causes another person to take possession of a residential dwelling without the consent of the lawful owner or an authorized agent of the lawful owner, for the purpose of obtaining a benefit. c.     A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  Each violation is a separate offense. d.    This section does not preclude the prosecution and conviction of a person under any other applicable provision of law. e.     This section does not apply to a tenant, subtenant, lessee, sublessee, or assignee having a lawful occupancy interest in a residential dwelling. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.